Hawaii statutes.
§338-23 Permit for removal, burial, or
other disposition of body. When a death or fetal death occurs or a dead
body is found, the body shall not be disposed of or removed from the
registration district until a written permit has been issued by the local agent
of the department of health, except that if the dead fetus is less than
twenty-four weeks of gestation, no permit shall be required and except that if
the death occurred as a result of an accident or other casualty occurrence, the
local agent of the department of health may orally authorize the dead bodies to
be removed from a registration district and airlifted or otherwise directly
transported to the Honolulu registration district for the preparation and
filing of death certificates and the issuance of written permits for further
disposition. [L 1949, c 327, §27; am L 1951, c 92, §4; RL 1955, §57-26; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-23; am L 1981, c 113, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next